Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Capitol Parking

4-8-201. Rules and regulations.

The governor is hereby authorized to promulgate rules and regulations governing the parking of motor vehicles on the state-owned property known as Capitol Hill and immediately surrounding the state capitol at Nashville. The office of the chief clerk of the senate and the office of the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall each be assigned a minimum of six (6) parking spaces pursuant to such rules and regulations; and the chief clerk of the senate and the chief clerk of the house of representatives shall jointly possess exclusive custody, control and direction of any parking spaces developed and constructed, after January 1, 2001, on the right side of the drive on Capitol Hill up to the state capitol.

Such rules and regulations when promulgated shall be enforced by the commissioner of general services, in the manner provided in this part.

Acts 1951, ch. 131, § 1 (Williams, § 423a); modified; Acts 1955, ch. 219, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, §§ 5, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-807; Acts 2004, ch. 736, § 1; 2010, ch. 1062, § 3.

Cross-References. Out-of-state tourists, applicability, §4-8-203.

Responsibility for illegal parking, §55-8-186.

4-8-202. Marking of parking space.

Such parking space as exists on Capitol Hill shall be marked and defined under the rules and regulations promulgated by the governor, with due regard to safety and the orderly operation of the business of this state.

Acts 1951, ch. 131, § 2 (Williams, § 423a); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-808.

Cross-References. Out-of-state tourists, applicability, §4-8-203.

4-8-203. Violation of parking or traffic regulations.

Any person found guilty of violation of the parking or traffic regulations promulgated under §§ 4-8-201 and 4-8-202 is subject to a civil penalty of ten dollars ($10.00) for the first offense, and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for second and subsequent offenses during a one-year period.

Any person who is found guilty of four (4) or more violations during a one-year period shall have any state-issued parking permit revoked for a period of one (1) year from the date of the last violation.

This section shall also apply to parking violations in the state employee parking lots described in § 4-3-1105, and to parking on any other property under state control.

Sections 4-8-201, 4-8-202 and this section shall not apply to tourists with out-of-state auto tags.

The commissioner of safety, or the commissioner's designee, shall conduct a hearing if the person charged with the violation so desires.

The hearing date shall be posted on the citation issued, and will be no less than fifteen (15), nor more than thirty-five (35), calendar days from the date of issuance.

Persons charged who do not desire a hearing may plead guilty to the charge by remitting the assessed civil penalty to the address on the citation.

At each such hearing, the state shall have the burden of proving the subject vehicle was in violation of the parking or traffic regulations promulgated under §§ 4-8-201 and 4-8-202, and failure to carry such burden shall be cause for dismissal of the case.

As provided in §§ 55-8-186 and 55-10-312, the proof of registration shall create the presumption the vehicle was operated by the owner or with the owner's knowledge and consent. It is the responsibility of the registered owner of the vehicle to provide the commissioner with sworn evidence that the vehicle was not being used by the owner, and provide the name, address and driver license number of the person in control of the vehicle at the time of the violation. If the owner fails to provide such information, then the owner shall become personally liable for the violation.

Failure of the person to appear on, or remit the civil penalty by, the hearing date shall result in notice being mailed to the address of the registered owner of the vehicle.

The notice shall set forth a date for the owner to appear and present the information required in subsection (c).

Failure of the registered owner, or the person who was in control of the vehicle on the date of the violation, to either appear for the scheduled hearing or remit the civil penalty shall cause the vehicle to be subject to immobilization.

If the vehicle is again found in violation, the vehicle will be immobilized by the department until such time as all outstanding civil penalties are paid by the owner.

It is the responsibility of the department to maintain records of all vehicles issued citations for violation of this chapter.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, may appeal in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

Acts 1951, ch. 131, § 3 (Williams, § 423a); modified; Acts 1955, ch. 219, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, §§ 5, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-809; Acts 1990, ch. 917, § 1; 2001, ch. 109, § 2.

4-8-204. Car pool section parking — Designation of area.

There shall be reserved a priority section of a sufficient number of parking spaces in the Capitol Hill state employees parking lot to accommodate those who wish to participate in the car pool program. The area shall be designated the “car pool section” to be used solely for car pool priority parking for state employees; however, unused parking spaces in the car pool section may be released at an appropriate time for use by other state employees.

Acts 1976, ch. 409, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-811.

4-8-205. Car pool section parking — Eligibility — Applications.

State employees desiring to take advantage of car pool section parking shall be required to execute a signed statement that the employee transports at least two (2) persons to and from work per day and containing the names and addresses of their regular passengers, the state department or office in which they are employed and their addresses, and their home and office telephone numbers. The statement shall also certify that regular passengers are not members of another car pool with a priority parking space.

The application for priority parking used in the state of Tennessee's operation car pool program by the department of general services may be used to carry out this section.

All state employees working in the area of the Capitol Hill complex shall be notified at least once a year of the availability of the car pool program.

The two (2) persons riding in the applicant's car shall all be employees of the state of Tennessee in order to qualify under § 4-8-204 and this section.

Acts 1976, ch. 409, § 2; 1979, ch. 31, § 1; modified; T.C.A., § 4-812; Acts 2009, ch. 148, §§ 1, 2.

4-8-206. Van section parking.

There shall be reserved a priority section of a sufficient number of parking spaces in the Capitol Hill state employees parking lot to accommodate those vans in which several state employees are commuting. The area shall be designated “van section” and used solely for van priority parking for state employees; however, unused parking spaces in the van section may be released at an appropriate time for use by other state employees.

The commissioner of general services shall develop and issue a policy or rule, as the commissioner deems appropriate, governing the vans and the state employees who may use van priority parking. Such policy or rule shall set eligibility requirements for the employees and the motor vehicles that may use such parking.

Acts 1980, ch. 724, § 1; 1992, ch. 627, § 1.